District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.44

Multiyear capital improvements plan.

The Mayor shall prepare and include in the annual budget a multiyear capital improvements plan for all agencies of the District which shall be based upon the approved current fiscal year budget and shall include:

(1)

The status, estimated period of usefulness, and total cost of each capital project on a full funding basis for which any appropriation is requested or any expenditure will be made in the forthcoming fiscal year and at least 4 fiscal years thereafter, including an explanation of change in total cost in excess of 5% for any capital project included in the plan of the previous fiscal year;

(2)

An analysis of the plan, including its relationship to other programs, proposals, or elements developed by the Mayor as the central planning agency for the District pursuant to § 1-204.23;

(3)

Identification of the years and amounts in which bonds would have to be issued, loans made, and costs actually incurred on each capital project identified; and

(4)

Appropriate maps or other graphics.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 800, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 444
National capital planning commission, public works program, Mayor’s submission of multi-year capital improvements plan, see § 2-1005.
This section is referenced in § 1-204.42, § 1-204.43, § 2-1005, § 38-2803, § 47-318, § 47-318.05a, § 47-336, and § 47-339.01.
1981 Ed., § 47-303.
1973 Ed., § 47-223.
Capital Program Coordinating Office established: See Mayor’s Order 84-87, May 16, 1984.

Annual plan for capital outlay borrowing from United States Treasury: Section 118 of Pub. L. 101-168, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1990, provided that at the start of the fiscal year, the Mayor shall develop an annual plan, by quarter and by project, for capital outlay borrowings and provided, that within a reasonable time after the close of each quarter, the Mayor shall report to the Council of the District of Columbia and the Congress the actual borrowing and spending progress compared with projections.

Approval by Council required prior to capital borrowing: Section 119 of Pub. L. 101-168, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1990, provided that the Mayor shall not borrow any funds for capital projects unless he has obtained prior approval from the Council of the District of Columbia, by resolution, identifying the projects and amounts to be financed with such borrowings.

General obligation bonds authorized: D.C. Law 5-115, effective September 26, 1984, authorized the issuance of general obligation bonds of the District of Columbia for the purpose of financing certain capital projects and refunding certain capital indebtedness of the District of Columbia.

D.C. Law 6-60, effective November 19, 1985, authorized the issuance of general obligation bonds of the District of Columbia for the purpose of financing certain capital projects and refunding certain capital indebtedness of the District of Columbia.

Capital projects funds borrowing authority resolution: Pursuant to Resolution 5-719, the “Capital Projects Funds Borrowing Authorization Resolution of 1984,” effective June 12, 1984, the Council approved the request of the Mayor for authority to borrow funds for capital projects.

Issuance of general obligation bonds authorized: Pursuant to Resolution 6-714, the “General Obligation Bonds Issuance Authorization Resolution of 1986,” effective June 17, 1986, the Council authorized the issuance of general obligation bonds for capital projects.

Pursuant to Resolution 7-96, the “General Obligation Bonds Issuance Authorization Resolution of 1987,” effective July 14, 1987, the Council authorized the issuance of general obligation bonds for capital projects.

Pursuant to Resolution 8-33, the “General Obligation Bond Issuance Approval Resolution of 1989”, effective April 18, 1989, the Council approved the borrowing of funds by the Mayor through the issuance and sale of general obligation bonds.

Pursuant to Resolution 8-246, the “General Obligation Bond Issuance 1990B Authorization Resolution of 1990,” effective July 27, 1990, the Council approved the borrowing of funds by the Mayor through the issuance and sale of general obligation bonds.

Submission date for budget request for fiscal year 1992: Pursuant to Resolution 8-312, the “Submission Date for the Fiscal Year 1992 Budget Approval Resolution of 1990,” effective December 21, 1990, the Council established the date by which the Mayor shall submit to the Council the proposed budget for the government of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1992, and identified information and documentation to be submitted to the Council with the proposed budget for the government of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1992.

General Obligation Bond Issuance 1991A Authorization Resolution of 1991: Pursuant to Resolution 9-39, effective May 24, 1991, the Council approved the borrowing of funds by the Mayor through the issuance and sale of general obligation bonds.

General Obligation Bond Issuance Approval Resolution of 1993: Pursuant to Resolution 10-49, effective June 11, 1993, the Council conditionally approved the borrowing of funds by the Mayor through the issuance and sale of general obligation bonds.

General Obligation Bond Issuance Conditional Approval Resolution of 1994: Pursuant to Resolution 10-392, effective June 21, 1994, the Council conditionally approved the borrowing of funds by the Mayor through the issuance and sale of general obligation bonds.

General Obligation Bond 1996 Issuance Authorization Emergency Resolution of 1996: Pursuant to Resolution 11-545, effective October 1, 1996, the Council approved, on an emergency basis, authorization for the borrowing of funds by the Mayor through the issuance and sale of general obligation bonds.

Enactment upon adoption of federal legislation: Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-254 provided that “§§ 47-101, 47-117, 47-130, 47-301, 47-302, 47-303, 47-304, 47-304.1, 47-305, 47-310, 47-312, 47-317.1 through 47-317.6, 47-321 through 47-325, 47-327 through 47-331, and 47-332 through 47-334 of Title 47 §§ 1-204.41, 1-204.55, 1-204.50, 1-204.42, 1-204.43, 1-204.44, 1-204.46, 1-204.53, 1-204.47, 1-204.48, 1-204.49, 1-204.24a through 1-204.24e, 47-317.06, 1-204.61 through 1-204.65, 1-204.71 through 1-204.75, 1-204.81, 1-204.85, 1-204.86 and 1-204.90, 2001 Ed. of the District of Columbia Code shall be enacted as part of Title 47 upon the adoption by Congress of legislation so enacting these sections.”